Hawaii statutes.
[§291-16] Safe routes to school
program surcharge. (a) In addition to any other civil penalties ordered
by the court, a person who violates any provision under this part shall be
ordered to pay a safe routes to school program surcharge of $10.

(b) The person shall
pay the surcharge to the clerk of the court. The surcharge shall be deposited
with the director of finance who shall credit the surcharge to the safe
routes to school program special fund established under section 291C‑4.
[L 2012, c 317, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next